Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Other

§ 6-9-201.
Trespass on closed or unsafe areas within ski areas; penalty; exceptions.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) if he:

Skis on a slope or trail that has been posted as “closed”;

Knowingly enters upon public or private lands from an adjoining ski area when the lands have been closed by the owner and posted as closed by the owner or by the ski area operator; or

Intentionally enters state or federal land leased and in use as a ski area, knowing:

The lessee of the premises has designated the land as an unsafe area; or

The land has been posted with warning signs, prohibiting entry, which are reasonably likely to come to the attention of the public.

This section does not apply to peace officers, national park or forest service officers, or persons authorized by the lessee of the premises.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1989, ch. 202, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or death from ski lift, ski tow or similar device, 95 ALR3d 203.

Ski resort's liability for skier's injuries resulting from condition of ski run or slope, 55 ALR4th 632.

§ 6-9-202.
Neglect to close fences; penalty.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) if he opens and neglects to close a gate or replace bars in a fence which crosses a private road or a river, stream or ditch.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fences and cattle guards generally, see §§

11-28-101

through

11-28-108

.

As to construction and repair of fences by the state highway department, see §

24-1-112

.

As to railroad fire guards and fences, see §§

37-9-301

through

37-9-312

.

Easement action. —

The trial court did not err by ruling that cattle guards did not materially increase the burden upon a servient estate and that requiring the gates to be closed would be overly burdensome and would deprive the holders of the essential use of their easement where the court found that when the gates were open, the owner's cattle did not routinely escape over cattle guards; in contrast, when the gates were closed, in order to reach their property, the easement holders were required to stop their vehicle at the first cattle guard and walk across it, open the gate, walk back across the cattle guard, reenter the vehicle, drive across the cattle guard, exit the vehicle again, and close the gate. White v. Allen, 2005 WY 72, 115 P.3d 8,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

White v. Allen, 2003 WY 39, 65 P.3d 395,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-9-203.
Unlawful use of toxic substances; penalty.

A person commits the offense of unlawful use of a toxic substance if he inhales or ingests or possesses with the purpose to inhale or ingest, for the purpose of altering his mental or physical state, any toxic substance that is not manufactured for human consumption or inhalation.

As used in this section “toxic substance” means:

Volatile solvents including, but not limited to, paint thinner, gasoline, correction fluid, felt-tip markers, nail polish remover and glue;

Aerosols containing propellants and solvents such as toluene including, but not limited to, spray paint, deodorant, hair products, cooking products and fabric protectors;

Gases including, but not limited to, butane, refrigerants and organic hydrocarbons not created for human ingestion, inhalation or injection; and

Nitrates including, but not limited to cyclohexyl nitrate, amyl nitrate and butyl nitrate.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to a bona fide institution of higher education conducting research with human volunteers pursuant to guidelines adopted by the institution or any federal or state agency.

A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 46, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 46, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.